South Dakota, session 2026, HB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. On or before September 1, 2026, the secretary of the Department of
Social Services shall submit a waiver request, as authorized by 7 U.S.C. § 2026 (January
1, 2026), to the United States Department of Agriculture, to exclude soft drinks from the
definition of eligible foods under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2 (January 1, 2026), for the supplemental
nutrition assistance program.
If the waiver is approved, the department shall implement the restriction within six
months of the date of approval.
If the waiver requested under this section is not approved, the secretary must
annually submit a waiver request until it is approved.
For the purposes of this section, "soft drink" means a nonalcoholic beverage that
contains natural or artificial sweeteners. The term does not include:
(1) Milk or milk products;
(2) Rice, soy, or similar milk substitutes; or
(3) Juices that have been approved by the Department of Health for eligibility in the
supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children.

26.255.10 2 1056
An Act to require that the Department of Social Services submit a federal waiver request to
exclude soft drinks from the supplemental nutrition assistance program.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1056
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1056 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1056 ENROLLED